Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1465.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.95.204 and 2022 c 29 s 11 are each amended to read as follows:(1) When a superior court places a defendant convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor on probation and orders supervision under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, the department of corrections has responsibility for supervision of defendants pursuant to RCW 9.94A.501 and 9.94A.5011. The county must reimburse the department of corrections for 25 percent of the cost of supervision for any defendant for whom the superior court ordered supervision by the department, unless the county assumes responsibility for the supervision under subsection (2) of this section.(2) A county legislative authority may assume responsibility for the supervision of defendants within its jurisdiction who have been convicted of a misdemeanor or gross misdemeanor and sentenced to probation by a superior court. If a county legislative authority chooses to assume responsibility for defendants supervised by the department, the assumption of responsibility shall be made by contract with the department of corrections on a biennial basis.(3) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its employees, community corrections officers, and volunteers who assist community corrections officers are not liable for any harm caused by the actions of a superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under the supervision of a county. A county, its probation department and employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist probation officers are not liable for any harm caused by the actions of a superior court misdemeanant probationer who is under the supervision of the department of corrections.(4) The state of Washington, the department of corrections and its employees, community corrections officers, any county providing supervision services pursuant to this section and its employees, probation officers, and volunteers who assist community corrections officers and probation officers in the superior court misdemeanant probation program are not liable for civil damages resulting from any act or omission in the rendering of superior court misdemeanant probation activities unless the act or omission constitutes gross negligence. For purposes of this section, "volunteers" is defined according to RCW 51.12.035.(5)(a) If a misdemeanant probationer requests permission to travel or transfer to another state, the assigned probation officer employed or contracted for by the county shall determine whether such request is subject to RCW 9.94A.745, the interstate compact for adult offender supervision. If such request is subject to the compact, the probation officer shall:(i) Notify the department of corrections of the probationer's request;(ii) Provide the department of corrections with the supporting documentation it requests for processing an application for transfer;(iii) Cease supervision of the probationer while another state supervises the probationer pursuant to the compact;(iv) Resume supervision if the probationer returns to this state before the term of probation expires.(b) The probationer shall receive credit for time served while being supervised by another state.Sec. 2. RCW 9.94A.702 and 2010 c 267 s 12 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender is sentenced to a term of confinement for one year or less for one of the following offenses, the court may impose up to one year of community custody:(a) A sex offense;(b) A violent offense;(c) A crime against a person under RCW 9.94A.411; (d) A felony violation of chapter 69.50 or 69.52 RCW, or an attempt, conspiracy, or solicitation to commit such a crime; or(e) A felony violation of RCW 9A.44.132(1) (failure to register).(2) If an offender is sentenced to a first-time offender waiver, the court may impose community custody as provided in RCW 9.94A.650.(3) The county must reimburse the department of corrections for 25 percent of the cost of supervision for any defendant for whom the superior court ordered supervision by the department.Sec. 3. RCW 9.92.060 and 2023 c 449 s 7 are each amended to read as follows:(1)(a) Whenever any person is convicted of any crime except murder, burglary in the first degree, arson in the first degree, robbery, rape of a child, or rape, the superior court may, in its discretion, at the time of imposing sentence upon such person, direct that such sentence be stayed and suspended until otherwise ordered by the superior court, and, upon such terms as the superior court may determine, that the sentenced person be placed under the charge of:(((a)))(i) A community corrections officer employed by the department of corrections, if the person is subject to supervision under RCW 9.94A.501 or 9.94A.5011; or(((b)))(ii) A probation officer employed or contracted for by the county, if the county has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers.(b) The county must reimburse the department of corrections for 25 percent of the cost of supervision for any defendant for whom the superior court ordered supervision by the department, unless the county assumes responsibility for the supervision under (a)(ii) of this subsection.(2) As a condition to suspension of sentence, the superior court may require the convicted person to make such monetary payments, on such terms as the superior court deems appropriate under the circumstances, as are necessary: (a) To comply with any order of the court for the payment of family support; (b) to make restitution to any person or persons who may have suffered loss or damage by reason of the commission of the crime in question or when the offender pleads guilty to a lesser offense or fewer offenses and agrees with the prosecutor's recommendation that the offender be required to pay restitution to a victim of an offense or offenses which are not prosecuted pursuant to a plea agreement; (c) to pay any fine imposed and not suspended and the court or other costs incurred in the prosecution of the case, including reimbursement of the state for costs of extradition if return to this state by extradition was required; and (d) to contribute to a county or interlocal drug fund.(3) At any time, including at sentencing, the court may determine that the offender is not required to pay, or may relieve the offender of the requirement to pay, full or partial restitution and accrued interest on restitution where the entity to whom restitution is owed is an insurer or a state agency, except for restitution owed to the department of labor and industries under chapter 7.68 RCW, if the court finds that the offender does not have the current or likely future ability to pay. A person does not have the current ability to pay if the person is indigent as defined in RCW 10.01.160(3). For the purposes of this subsection, the terms "insurer" and "state agency" have the same meanings as provided in RCW 9.94A.750(3).(4) As a condition of the suspended sentence, the superior court may order the probationer to report to the secretary of corrections or such officer as the secretary may designate and as a condition of the probation to follow the instructions of the secretary. If the county legislative authority has elected to assume responsibility for the supervision of superior court misdemeanant probationers within its jurisdiction, the superior court misdemeanant probationer shall report to a probation officer employed or contracted for by the county. In cases where a superior court misdemeanant probationer is sentenced in one county, but resides within another county, there must be provisions for the probationer to report to the agency having supervision responsibility for the probationer's county of residence.(5) If restitution to the victim has been ordered under subsection (2)(b) of this section and the superior court has ordered supervision, the officer supervising the probationer shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain whether restitution has been made as ordered. If the superior court has ordered supervision and restitution has not been made, the officer shall inform the prosecutor of that violation of the terms of the suspended sentence not less than three months prior to the termination of the suspended sentence.--- END ---